Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1003
Improvement districts.

The proper governing body or governing bodies, having jurisdiction thereof, after making all arrangements above provided, may adopt a final plan, the area included in which shall constitute an interstate conservation or recreational improvement district.

Laws 1935, c. 39, § 3, p. 155;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1703;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 18-903.